Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2742.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:(1) Subject to the conditions and limitations provided in this section, this chapter does not apply to sales of qualified items purchased by an individual each year between 12:00 a.m. on the Friday immediately following Thanksgiving Day, and 11:59 p.m. on the Monday following Thanksgiving Day.(2) For the purposes of this section, "qualified item" means any item with a sales price of $500 or less per item.(3) The department must adopt rules for the administration of this section and may adopt emergency rules. These rules must be consistent with the streamlined sales and use tax agreement, to the extent the department considers advisable, so long as the rules are consistent with this section. The department must provide taxpayer guidance regarding the sales and use tax holiday created in this section and section 2 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:(1) Subject to the conditions and limitations provided in this section, this chapter does not apply to the use of qualified items purchased by an individual each year between 12:00 a.m. on the Friday immediately following Thanksgiving Day, and 11:59 p.m. on the Monday following Thanksgiving Day.(2) For purposes of this section, "qualified item" means any item with a sales price of $500 or less per item.(3) The department must adopt rules for the administration of this section and may adopt emergency rules. These rules must be consistent with the streamlined sales and use tax agreement, to the extent the department considers advisable, so long as the rules are consistent with this section. The department must provide taxpayer guidance regarding the sales and use tax holiday created in this section and section 1 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.--- END ---